North Carolina statutes. Chapter 135. Retirement System for Teachers and State Employees; Social Security; State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees.
Article 3A. Other Benefits for Teachers, State Employees, Retired State Employees, and Child Health. [Repealed]

§§ 135-43 through 135-47.3.
[Repealed]

Recodified as Article 3B of Chapter 135 by Session Laws 2011-85, ss. 2.4 through 2.8, effective January 1, 2012.

History.
S. 135-43.1; 1981, c. 859, s. 13.18; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1398, s. 5; 1983, c. 452, ss. 1, 2; 1985, c. 732, s. 45; 1987, c. 61; c. 857, s. 1; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1038, s. 19.1; 1991, c. 739, s. 21; 1995, c.
229, s. 1; 1997-278, s. 2; 1997-468, s. 1; 1998-1, s. 4(b); 2008-168, ss. 1(a), (c), (e); repealed by Laws 2011-85, s. 2.9 effective January 1, 2012; s. 135-43.2; 2008-168, s. 2.1; 2008-187, s. 49; repealed by 2011-85, s. 2.9 effective
January 1, 2012; s. 135-43.3; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1398, s. 6; 1985, c. 732, ss. 47, 67; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1020, s. 20; 2000-140, s. 93.1(a); 2001-424, s. 12.2(b); 2008-168, ss. 1(a), 2(a), (b); repealed by 2011-85,
s. 2.9 effective January 1, 2012. 1985, c. 732, s. 57; 1991, c. 427, s. 8; 2007-323, s. 28.22A(d); 2008-168, ss. 1(a), 2(a), (i); repealed by 2011-85, s. 2.9, effective January 1, 2012; s. 135-44.3; 1985, c. 732, s. 57; 1991, c. 427,
s. 8; 2007-323, s. 28.22A(d); 2008-168, ss. 1(a), 2(a), (i); repealed by 2011-85, s. 2.9, effective January 1, 2012; s. 135-44.4 (except for subdivision (26); 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1398, s. 6; 1983, c. 922, s. 2; 1985, c. 732,
ss. 7, 9, 23, 24, 50, 51; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1020, ss. 3, 20; 1987, c. 857, ss. 6, 7; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1091, s. 5; 1989, c. 752, s. 22(a); 1991, c. 427, s. 3; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 679, s. 10.3; 1997-468,
s. 2; 1997-519, s. 3.15; 1998-1, s. 4(c); 2000-141, s. 3; 2001-253, ss. 1(a), 1(q); 2001-487, s. 85.5; 2006-249, s. 4(b); 2007-323, s. 28.22(i); 2008-107, s. 10.13(a); 2008-168, ss. 1(a), 2(a), (k), (j); 2009-16, s. 5(b); repealed
by 2011-85, s. 2.9, effective January 1, 2012; s. 135-44.6(a), (b), (f); 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1398, s. 6; 1985, c. 732, s. 52; 1991, c. 427, s. 5; 1997-468, s. 4; 1998-1, s. 4(e); 1999-237, s. 28.29(h); 2003-69, s. 2; 2004-124,
s. 31.21(c); 2005-276, s. 29.31(e); 2007-323, s. 28.22A(m), (m1), (o); 2007-345, ss. 11, 12; 2008-107, s. 10.13(a); 2008-168, ss. 1(a), 2(a), (m); 2009-281, s. 1; 2009-571, s. 3(c); s. 135-45(b), (f)-(h); 2008-168, s. 3(c); 2009-16,
ss. 2(f), 5(h); 2009-281, s. 1; 2009-313, s. 2; repealed by 2011-85; s. 135-45.6; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1398, s. 6; 1983, c. 922, s. 7; 1985, c. 192, ss. 5, 9, 12; c. 732, ss. 16-18; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1020, ss. 10,
20; 1987, c. 857, s. 14; 1991, c. 427, ss. 13, 20; 1995, c. 507, s. 7.24(a); 1999-237, s. 28.28(b); 2000-141, s. 1; 2000-184, s. 2; 2001-253, ss. 1(d), 1(e); 2003-186, s. 5(a); 2005-276, s. 29.31(a); 2006-249, s. 2(a); 2007-323, s.
28.22A(a); 2008- 168, ss. 1(a), 3(a), (j); 2009-16, s. 2(c); 2009-571, s. 3(e); 2011-85, s. 1.3(b); 2011-96, s. 2(a) repealed by 2011-85, s. 2.9, effective January 1, 2012. s. 135-45.7; 2008-168, s. 3(l); repealed by 2011-85, s. 2.10,
effective January 1, 2012; s. 135-45.8; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1398, s. 6; 1983, c. 922, ss. 15, 21.4; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1020, ss. 16, 20, 21, 25, 26; 1987, c. 282, s. 35; 1991, c. 427, ss. 16, 30, 40; 1993, c. 464,
s. 7; 1995, c. 535, s. 29; 1997-456, s. 55.9; 1997-468, s. 6; 1997-512, ss. 4, 13; 1998-212, s. 28.29(c); 2000-141, s. 5; 2007-323, ss. 28.22A(j), (k); 2008-168, ss. 1(a), 3(a), (m), (v); 2009-16, s. 2(d); 2010-2, s. 2; 2010-96, s.
33; repealed by Laws 2011-85, s. 2.9, effective January 1, 2012. s. 135-45.9; 1991, c. 427, s. 32; 1993, c. 464, ss. 3(a), 4; 1995, c. 157, s. 2; c. 406, s. 2; 1997-512, s. 14; 1999-186, s. 1; 1999-199, s. 3; 1999-210, s. 8; 1999-351,
s. 7; 2001-258, s. 1; 2001-487, s. 40(n); 2003-368, ss. 2, 3; 2004-124, s. 31.28; 2007-323, ss. 28.22(f), (o); 2008-168, ss. 1(a), 3(a), (n); 2009-16, s. 5(d); repealed by Laws 2011-85, s. 2.9, effective January 1, 2012. s. 135-45.11;
2008-168, s. 3(p); repealed by Laws 2011-85, s. 2.9, effective January 1, 2012. s. 135-45.14; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1398, s. 6; 1983, c. 922, s. 18; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1020, ss. 20, 30; 1989, c. 770, s. 35; 2008-168,
ss. 1(a), 3(a), (s); repealed by Laws 2011-85, s. 2.9, effective January 1, 2012; 2011-96, s. 4. s. 135-46.3; 1997-468, s. 7; 2008-168, ss. 1(a), 4(a); repealed by Laws 2011-85, s. 2.9, effective January 1, 2012. s. 135-47; 1998-1,
s. 4(a); 2007-323, s. 28.22A(i); 2008- 107, s. 10.13(b), (n); 2008-168, ss. 1(a), 4(a); repealed by 2008-107, s. 10.13(n), effective July 1, 2010. s. 135-47.1; 1998-1, s. 4(a); 2008-168, ss. 1(a), 4(a); repealed by Laws 2011-85, s.
2.9, effective January 1, 2012. s. 135-47.3; 2008-107, s. 10.13(c); repealed by Laws 2011-85, s. 2.9, effective January 1, 2012.

§ 135-48.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

§ 135-999.

TABLES OF COMPARABLE
SECTIONS FOR
CHAPTER 135, ARTICLE 3B

Former to Present

Editor’s Note.
— The following table shows G.S. sections from former Chapter 135, Article 3A, and their comparable, Chapter 135, revised Article 3B numbers.

Former Present Section Section Part 1 135-43(a) and (b) 135-48.10 135-43(c) 135-48.57 135-43.1 Repealed 135-43.2 Repealed 135-43.3 Repealed 135-43.4 135-48.12 135-43.5 135-48.28 135-43.6 135-48.27 135-43.7 135-48.35 Part 2 135-44 135-48.20 135-44.1 135-48.21
135-44.2 135-48.23 135-44.3 Repealed 135-44.4(26) 135-48.56 135-44.4, remainder Repealed 135-44.5 135-48.5 135-44.6(a), (b), (f) Repealed 135-44.6(d) 135-48.58 135-44.6(e) 135-48.55 135-44.7 135-48.24 135-44.8 135-48.25 Part 3 135-45(a),(e)
135-48.2 135-45(b) Repealed 135-45(c) 135-48.8 135-45(d) 135-48.32 135-45(d1) 135-48.33 135-45(e)-(h) Repealed 135-45.1 135-48.1 135-45.2(a),(a1),(b),(c) 135-48.40 135-45.2(d)-(k) 135-48.41 135-45.3 135-48.42 135-45.4 135-48.43 135-45.5
135-48.54 135-45.6 Repealed 135-45.7 Repealed 135-45.8 Repealed 135-45.9 Repealed 135-45.10 135-48.38 135-45.11 Repealed 135-45.12 135-48.44 135-45.13 135-48.45 135-45.14 Repealed 135-45.15 135-48.37 135-45.16 135-48.3 Part 4 135-46
135-48.60 135-46.1 135-48.61 135-46.2 135-48.62 135-46.3 Repealed Part 5 135-47.1 Repealed 135-47.2 108A-70.20A 135-47.3 Repealed

Click to view

Present to Former

Editor’s Note.
— The following table shows G.S. sections from revised Chapter 135, Article 3B, and their Chapter 135, former Article 3A numbers.

Present Former Section Section Part 1 135-48.1 135-45.1 135-48.2(a),(b) 135-45(a), (e) 135-48.3 135-45.16 135-48.5 135-44.5 135-48.8 135-45(c) 135-48.10 135-43(a), (b) 135-48.12 135-43.4 Part 2 135-48.20 135-44 135-48.21 135-44.1 135-48.22 New 135-48.23
135-44.2 135-48.24 135-44.7 135-48.25 135-44.8 135-48.27 135-43.6 135-48.28 135-43.5 Part 3 135-48.30 New 135-48.32 135-45(d) 135-48.33 135-45(d1) 135-48.34 New 135-48.35 135-43.7 135-48.37 135-45.15 135-48.38 135-45.10 Part 4 135-48.40
135-45.2(a), (a1),(b),(c) 135-48.41 135-45.2(d)-(k) 135-48.42 135-45.3 135-48.43 135-45.4 135-48.44 135-45.12 135-48.45 135-45.13 Part 5 135-48.50 through 135-48.52 New 135-48.54 135-45.5 135-48.55 135-44.6(e) 135-48.56 135-44.4(26)
135-48.57 135-43(c) 135-48.58 135-44.6(d) Part 6 135-48.60 135-46 135-48.61 135-46.1 135-48.62 135-46.2

Click to view